gl_ES.dic
A/1001,1002,1003		# Amperio.
b/1001,1004			# Bit.
B/1001,1004			# Byte.
Bq/1001,1002,1003		# Becquerel.
C/1001,1002,1003		# Coulomb.
F/1001,1002,1003		# Farad.
g/1001,1002,1003		# Gramo.
Gy/1001,1002,1003		# Gray.
H/1001,1002,1003		# Henry.
Hz/1001,1002,1003		# Hercio.
J/1001,1002,1003		# Xulio.
K/1001,1002,1003		# Kelvin.
kat/1001,1002,1003
lm/1001,1002,1003		# Lumen.
lx/1001,1002,1003		# Lux.
m/1001,1002,1003		# Metro.
N/1001,1002,1003		# Newton.
Pa/1001,1002,1003		# Pascal.
s/1001,1002,1003		# Segundo.
S/1001,1002,1003		# Siemens.
sr/1001,1002,1003		# Estereorradián.
Sv/1001,1002,1003		# Sievert.
T/1001,1002,1003		# Tesla.
V/1001,1002,1003		# Voltio.
W/1001,1002,1003		# Watt.
Wb/1001,1002,1003		# Wéber.
Ω/1001,1002,1003		# Ohm.
